California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(D) Noncannabis food or beverage products are not contaminated by or commingled with any cannabis products sold or served on the premises where the consumption of cannabis or cannabis products is allowed.

(E) (i) Smoking or vaporizing of any cannabis or cannabis product by an employee or customer is not allowed in the food preparation, food storage, or warewashing area of a food facility located on the premises.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the following definitions apply:

(I) “Food facility” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 113789 of the Health and Safety Code.

(II) “Warewashing” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 113940 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) The local jurisdiction considers whether to require adequate ventilation and filtration systems.

(i) Ventilation and filtration systems are considered adequate for the purpose of this subparagraph if they prevent smoke and odors from migrating to any other part of the building hosting the consumption lounge or any neighboring building or grounds.

(ii) Nothing in this subparagraph prohibits a local jurisdiction from allowing one or more forms of cannabis consumption on the premises of a retailer or microbusiness licensed under this division, including smoking, vaporizing, and ingesting of cannabis or cannabis products, while prohibiting other forms of cannabis consumption on the premises of a retailer or microbusiness licensed under this division.

(G) (i) Employees are permitted at their discretion and without penalty or sanction to wear a mask for
 respiration, including N95 and NIOSH N95 rated masks in any area where cannabis is smoked.

(ii) Employers are required to pay for the mask.

(H) When hired, employees who will be working where cannabis or cannabis product are smoked shall be provided in writing the Department of Public Health or its successor’s guidance regarding secondhand cannabis smoke.

(I) A cannabis consumption lounge that offers on-site consumption of cannabis products shall include secondhand smoke in their analysis of potential work hazards for purposes of their injury and illness prevention programs required by Section 3203 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(J) Loitering in or around the business is prohibited, and the retailer or microbusiness shall ensure the absence of loitering.

(h) This division shall not be interpreted to supersede Section 6404.5 of the Labor Code.

(i) This section does not alter or affect the prohibition on the sale of alcoholic beverages by a licensee, as provided in Section 26054, on or at a venue premises licensed under this division.

(j) If a retailer or microbusiness license issued under this division is suspended, the licensee shall not engage in activities authorized under subdivision (g) for the duration of the license suspension.

(k) All noncannabis food and beverages present, pursuant
 to this section, on the premises of a retailer or microbusiness licensed under this division shall be stored and displayed separately and distinctly from all cannabis and cannabis products present on the premises.

(l) Subdivision (g) does not authorize a retailer or microbusiness licensed under this division to prepare or sell industrial hemp or any products containing industrial hemp.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 22.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26201.

Any standards, requirements, and regulations regarding health and safety, environmental protection, testing, security, food safety, and worker protections established by the state shall be the minimum standards for all licensees under this division statewide. A local jurisdiction may establish additional standards, requirements, and regulations.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 6.1.)
-------------------------------------------

26202.

(a) A local jurisdiction may enforce this division and the regulations promulgated by the department if delegated the power to do so by the department.

(b) The department shall implement the delegation of enforcement authority in subdivision (a) through an agreement between the department and the local jurisdiction to which enforcement authority is to be delegated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 86.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 21. Funding [26210. - 26211.]

26210.

(a) The Marijuana Control Fund, formerly known as the Medical Cannabis Regulation and Safety Act Fund and the Medical Marijuana Regulation and Safety Act Fund, is hereby renamed the Cannabis Control Fund. Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, the fund shall include any interest and dividends earned on moneys in the fund.

(b) Upon the effective date of this section, whenever “Marijuana Control Fund,” “Medical Cannabis Regulation and Safety Act Fund,” or “Medical Marijuana Regulation and Safety Act Fund” appears in any statute, regulation, or contract, or in any other code, it shall be construed to refer to the Cannabis Control Fund.

(c) Any General Fund or special fund loan that
 was used to establish and support the regulatory activities of the state licensing entities pursuant to former Section 19351 shall be repaid by the initial proceeds from fees collected pursuant to this division or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this division, by January 1, 2022. Should the initial proceeds from fees not be sufficient to repay the loan, moneys from the Cannabis Fines and Penalties Account shall be made available to the department, by appropriation of the Legislature, to repay the loan.

(d) Except as otherwise provided, all moneys collected pursuant to this division as a result of fines or penalties imposed under this division shall be deposited directly into the Cannabis Fines and Penalties Account, which is hereby continued in existence, and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 87.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26210.5.

By July 1, 2018, the Bureau of Cannabis Control, in coordination with the Department of General Services, shall establish an office to collect fees and taxes in the County of Humboldt, County of Trinity, or County of Mendocino in order to ensure the safe payment and collection of cash in those counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 88.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26211.

(a) Funds for the initial establishment and support of the regulatory activities under this division, including the public information program described in subdivision (c), and for the activities of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration under Part 14.5 (commencing with Section 34010) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code until July 1, 2017, or until the 2017 Budget Act is enacted, whichever occurs later, shall be advanced from the General Fund and shall be repaid by the initial proceeds from fees collected pursuant to this division, any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this division, or revenues collected from the tax imposed by Sections 34011 and 34012 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, by January 1, 2025.

(1) Funds advanced pursuant to this subdivision shall be appropriated to the department as necessary to implement the provisions of this division, and to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, as necessary, to implement the provisions of Part 14.5 (commencing with Section 34010) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) Within 45 days of November 9, 2016, the date this section became operative:

(A) The Director of Finance shall determine an amount of the initial advance from the General Fund to the Cannabis Control Fund that does not exceed thirty million dollars ($30,000,000); and

(B) There shall be advanced a sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) from the General Fund to the State Department of Health Care Services to provide for the public information program described in subdivision
 (c).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the Legislature shall provide sufficient funds to the Cannabis Control Fund to support the activities of the department under this division, and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration to support its activities under Part 14.5 (commencing with Section 34010) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. It is anticipated that this funding will be provided annually beginning on July 1, 2017.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services shall establish and implement a public information program no later than September 1, 2017. This public information program shall, at a minimum, describe the provisions of the Control, Regulate and Tax Adult Use of Marijuana Act of 2016, the scientific basis for restricting access of cannabis and cannabis products to persons under the age of 21 years, describe the penalties for providing access to
 cannabis and cannabis products to persons under the age of 21 years, provide information regarding the dangers of driving a motor vehicle, boat, vessel, aircraft, or other vehicle used for transportation while impaired from cannabis use, the potential harms of using cannabis while pregnant or breastfeeding, and the potential harms of overusing cannabis or cannabis products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 89.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22. Cannabis Cooperative Associations [26220. - 26231.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [26220. - 26220.3.]

26220.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26220.1.

“Association” means any cannabis cooperative that is organized pursuant to this chapter. An association shall be deemed incorporated pursuant to this chapter, or organized pursuant to this chapter and shall be deemed a cultivator of a cannabis product within the meaning of this chapter, if it is functioning under, or is subject to, the provisions of this chapter, irrespective of whether it was originally incorporated pursuant to those provisions or was incorporated under other provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26220.2.

“Member” includes members of associations without capital stock and holders of common stock in associations that are organized with shares of stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26220.3.

“Cannabis product” includes any cannabis associated with a licensed cultivator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [26222. - 26222.6.]

26222.

The purpose of this chapter is to do all of the following:

(a) Promote, foster, and encourage the intelligent and orderly marketing of cannabis product through cooperation.

(b) Eliminate speculation and waste.

(c) Make the distribution of cannabis product as direct as can be efficiently done.

(d) Stabilize the marketing of cannabis product.

(e) Satisfy the conditions of Section 26052.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26222.1.

An exemption under law that applies to a cannabis product in the possession, or under the control, of the individual cultivator, shall apply similarly and completely to the cannabis product that is delivered by its cultivator members that are in the possession, or under the control, of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26222.2.

A person, firm, corporation, or association, that is hereafter organized or doing business in this state, may not use the word “cannabis cooperative” as part of its corporate name or other business name or title for producers’ cooperative marketing activities, unless it has complied with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26222.3.

An association that is organized pursuant to this chapter shall not conspire in restraint of trade, or serve as an illegal monopoly, attempt to lessen competition, or to fix prices in violation of law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26222.4.

The marketing contracts and agreements between an association that is organized pursuant to this chapter and its members and any agreements authorized in this chapter shall not result in restraint of trade, or violation of law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26222.5.

The General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) applies to each association that is organized pursuant to this chapter, except where those provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter. For the purpose of associations organized without shares of stock, the members shall be deemed to be “shareholders” as the term is used in the General Corporation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26222.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure does not apply to a proprietary interest in an association organized in accordance with this chapter. A proprietary interest that would otherwise escheat to the state pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall instead become the property of the association.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no proprietary interest shall become the property of the association under this section unless all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) At least 60 days’ prior notice of
 the proposed transfer of the proprietary interest to the association is given to the affected member by first-class or certified mail to the last address of the member shown on the association’s records, and by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the member last resided as shown on the association’s records. Notice given pursuant to this paragraph constitutes actual notice.

(2) No written notice objecting to the transfer is received by the association from the affected member or, if the member is deceased, from the member’s heirs or the executor or executrix of the estate, prior to the date of the proposed transfer.

(c) “Proprietary interest” means and includes any membership, membership certificate, membership share, share certificate, or equity or dividend certificate of any class representing a proprietary interest in, and issued by, the
 association together with all accrued and unpaid earnings, dividends, and patronage distributions relating thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Purposes [26223. - 26223.]

26223.

(a) Three or more natural persons, who are engaged in the cultivation of any cannabis product, may form an association pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of engaging in any activity in connection with any of the following:

(1) The cultivation, marketing, or selling of the cannabis products of its members.

(2) The growing, harvesting, curing, drying, trimming, packing, grading, storing, or handling of any product of its members.

(3) The manufacturing, selling, or supplying to its members of machinery, equipment, or supplies.

(4) The financing of the activities that
 are specified by this section.

(b) Members of a cannabis cooperative shall be disclosed to the department before the application is processed.

(c) Members of a cannabis cooperative formed pursuant to this chapter shall be limited to cultivators who only hold a single Type 1 or Type 2 license.

(d) Collectively, members of a cannabis cooperative shall not grow more than four acres of total canopy size of cultivation throughout the state during the period that the respective licensees are valid.

(e) No member of a cooperative formed pursuant to this section shall be licensed to operate a cannabis business in another state or country.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 90.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Articles of Incorporation [26224. - 26224.2.]

26224.

The articles of incorporation of an association shall show that the signers of the articles of incorporation are engaged in the cultivation of cannabis products, and that they propose to incorporate an association pursuant to this chapter, and shall state all of the following:

(a) The name of the association.

(b) The purposes for which it is formed.

(c) The city, county, or city and county where the principal office for the transaction of business of the association is to be located.

(d) The number of directors of the association, which shall not be less than three, and
 the names and addresses of the persons who are to serve as first directors. If it is desired that the first directors shall serve for terms of different lengths, the term for which each person so named to serve shall also be stated.

(e) If organized without shares of stock, whether the voting power and the property rights and interest of each member are equal or unequal. If voting power and property rights and interest of each member are unequal, the general rule or rules that are applicable to all members by which the voting power and the property rights and interests, respectively, of each member may be and are determined and fixed shall also be stated.

(f) (1) If organized with shares of stock, the number of shares that may be issued and if the shares are to have a par value, the par value of each share, and the aggregate par value of all shares. If the
 shares are to be without par value, it shall be so stated.

(2) If the shares of stock are to be classified, a description of the classes of shares and a statement of the number of shares of each kind or class and the nature and extent of the preferences, rights, privileges, and restrictions that are granted to or imposed upon the holders of the respective classes of stock. Except as to the matters and things so stated, no distinction shall exist between the classes of stock or the holders of them. One class of stock shall always be known as common stock, and voting power may be restricted to holders of common stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26224.1.

Articles of incorporation shall be signed, acknowledged, and filed in the manner that is prescribed by the general laws of this state for domestic corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26224.2.

The articles of incorporation of any association may be amended in the manner and for the purposes which are authorized by the General Corporation Law, Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bylaws [26225. - 26225.95.]

26225.

Each association shall, within 30 days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management, a code of bylaws, consistent with this chapter. The vote or written assent of shareholders or members that hold at least a majority of the voting power is necessary to adopt the bylaws and is effectual to repeal or amend a bylaw, or to adopt an additional bylaw. The power to repeal and amend the bylaws, and adopt new bylaws, may, by a similar vote, or similar written assent, be delegated to the board of directors, which authority may, by a similar vote, or similar written assent, be revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.1.

The bylaws may prescribe the time, place, and manner of calling and conducting its meetings. Meetings of members or stockholders shall be held at the place as provided in the bylaws, or, if no provision is made, in the city, county, or city and county where the principal place of business is located at a place designated by the board of directors. Meetings of the board of directors may be held at any place within or without the state that is fixed by a quorum of the board of directors unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.2.

The bylaws may prescribe the number of stockholders, directors, or members that constitutes a quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.3.

The bylaws may prescribe the following:

(a) The right of members or stockholders to vote by proxy or by mail or both, and the conditions, manner, form, and effects of those votes.

(b) The right of members or stockholders to cumulate their votes and the prohibition, if any, of cumulative voting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.4.

(a) The bylaws may prescribe the qualifications, compensation, duties, and term of office of directors and officers and the time of their election.

(b) The number of directors set forth in the articles of incorporation shall be either a fixed number or a variable number. If a fixed number, it shall not be less than three, and if a variable number, the stated minimum shall not be less than three and the stated maximum shall not be greater than two times the stated minimum minus one.

(c) The number of directors may also be set forth in the bylaws either as a fixed number or as a variable number subject to the same limitations as in subdivision (b). After shares have been issued
 or members have been admitted, any adoption or amendment of the bylaw provision shall be approved by the outstanding shares as provided in Section 152 of the Corporations Code.

(d) In the event of an inconsistency between an article provision referred to in subdivision (b) and a bylaw provision referred to in subdivision (c), the provision more recently adopted or amended shall prevail.

(e) If a variable number of directors is set forth in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, the exact number of directors shall be fixed, within the limits specified, by approval of the board of directors or the shareholders as provided in Section 153 of the Corporations Code in the manner designated in the bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.5.

The bylaws may prescribe penalties for violations of the bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.6.

The bylaws may prescribe the amount of entrance, organization, and membership fees, if any, the manner and method of collection of the fees, and the purposes for which they may be used.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.7.

The bylaws may prescribe the amount that each member or stockholder shall be required to pay annually, or from time to time, if at all, to carry on the business of the association, the charge, if any, to be paid by each member or stockholder for services that are rendered by the association to him, the time of payment and the manner of collection, and the marketing contract between the association and its members or stockholders that every member or stockholder may be required to sign.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.8.

The bylaws may prescribe the amount of dividends, if any, that may be declared on the stock or membership capital. To the extent that dividends are payable out of the excess of association income over association expenses attributable to business transacted with or for members, dividends shall not exceed 8 percent per annum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.9.

The bylaws may prescribe any of the following:

(a) The number and qualification of members or stockholders of the association and the conditions precedent to membership or ownership of common stock.

(b) The method, time, and manner of permitting members to withdraw or the holders of common stock to transfer their stock.

(c) The manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members, and of the shares of common stock.

(d) The conditions under which, and time when, membership of a member shall cease.

(e) The automatic suspension of the rights of a member when he or she ceases to be eligible to membership in the association.

(f) The mode, manner, and effect of the expulsion of a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26225.95.

(a) The bylaws may prescribe any of the following:

(1) The manner of determining the value of a member’s interest and provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of a member or upon the expulsion of a member or forfeiture of his or her membership, or at the option of the association, the purchase at a price fixed by conclusive appraisal by the board of directors.

(2) The conditions and terms for the repurchase by the association from its stockholders of their stock upon their disqualification as stockholders.

(b) If a member is expelled and the bylaws do not provide any procedure
 or penalty for expulsion, the board of directors shall equitably and conclusively appraise his or her property interest in the association and shall fix the amount of his or her property interest in money, which shall be paid to him or her within one year after such expulsion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Directors and Management [26226. - 26226.9.]

26226.

The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than three directors who are elected by the members or stockholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.1.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that directors shall be elected from the several districts. If the bylaws divides the territory into districts for the election of directors, the bylaws shall specify the number of directors to be elected by each district and the manner and method of reapportioning the directors and of redistricting the territory covered by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.2.

The bylaws may provide that primary elections shall be held to nominate directors. If the bylaws provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts, the bylaws may also provide that the results of the primary elections in the various districts shall be final and shall be ratified at the annual meeting of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.3.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts, and that the directors shall be elected by representatives or advisers, who themselves have been elected by the members or stockholders from the several territorial districts. If the bylaws divide the territory into districts for the election of representatives or advisers who elect the directors, the bylaws shall specify the number of representatives or advisers to be elected by each district and the manner and method of reapportioning the representatives or advisers and of redistricting the territory that is covered by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.4.

The bylaws may provide that one or more directors may be chosen by a public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members. The director shall represent primarily the interest of the general public in the association. The director shall have the same powers and rights as other directors. These directors shall not number more than one-fifth of the entire number of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.5.

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to the committee all the functions and powers of the board of directors, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.6.

An association may provide a fair remuneration for the time that is actually spent by its officers and directors in its service and for the service of the members of its executive committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.7.

If a vacancy on the board of directors occurs, except by expiration of term, the remaining members of the board, by a majority vote, shall fill the vacancy, unless the bylaws provide for an election of directors by districts. If the bylaws provide for an election of directors by districts, the vacancy shall be filled either by the election of a director from the district in which the vacancy occurs or by the board of directors calling a special meeting of the members or stockholders in that district to fill the vacancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.8.

(a) The directors shall elect a president, one or more vice presidents, a secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers as may be prescribed by the bylaws. Any two or more offices, except those of president and secretary, may be held by the same person.

(b) The treasurer may be a bank or a depository and, as such, shall not be considered as an officer, but as a function of the board of directors. In such case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, except that the funds shall be deposited only as and where authorized by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.9.

(a) A member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing them in writing with the secretary of the association, together with a petition that is signed by 5 percent of the members, which requests the removal of the officer or director in question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association and, by a vote of a majority of the members, the association may remove the officer or director and fill the vacancy. The director or officer, against whom the charges have been brought, shall be informed in writing of the charges previous to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel and to present witnesses. The person bringing the charges against him or her shall have the same opportunity.

(b) If the bylaws provide for election of directors by districts with primary elections in each district, the petition for removal of a director shall be signed by 20 percent of the members that reside in the district from which the director was elected. The board of directors shall call a special meeting of the members who reside in that district to consider the removal of the director. By a vote of the majority of the members of that district at the special meeting, the director in question shall be removed from office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Powers [26227. - 26227.9.]

26227.

An association may engage in any activity in connection with the growing, harvesting, curing, drying, trimming, packing, grading, storing, or handling of any cannabis product that is produced or delivered to it by its members; or any activity in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by its members of supplies, machinery, or equipment, or in the financing of any such activities; or in any one or more of the activities that are specified in this section with a valid license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.1.

An association may borrow without limitation as to the amount of corporate indebtedness or liability and may make advances to members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.2.

An association may act as the agent or representative of any member or members in any of the activities specified in Section 26226.2 or 26226.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.3.

An association may purchase or otherwise acquire, hold, own, and exercise all rights of ownership in, sell, transfer, pledge, or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on, or the retirement or redemption of, shares of the capital stock or bonds of an association that is engaged in any related activity or in the growing, harvesting, curing, drying, trimming, packing, grading, storing, or handling of a cannabis product that is handled by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.4.

An association may establish reserves and invest the funds of the reserves in bonds or in other property as may be provided in the bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.5.

An association may buy, hold, and exercise all privileges of ownership over such real or personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the conduct and operation of, or incidental to, the business of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.6.

An association may levy assessments in the manner and in the amount as may be provided in its bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.7.

An association may do any of the following anywhere:

(a) That which is what is necessary, suitable, or proper for the accomplishment of a purpose, or the attainment of an object, that is enumerated in this article.

(b) That which is conducive to, or expedient for, the interest or benefit of the association.

(c) Contract accordingly.

(d) Exercise and possess all powers, rights, and privileges that are necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged.

(e) Exercise any other rights, powers, and privileges that are granted by the laws of this state to ordinary corporations, except such as are inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.75.

An association may use or employ any of its facilities for any purpose, provided the proceeds that arise from such use and employment shall go to reduce the cost of operation for its members. The cannabis products that are handled for, or the services, machinery, equipment, or supplies or facilities that are furnished to, nonmembers shall not, however, exceed in value the cannabis products that are handled for, or the services, merchandise, or facilities that are supplied to, members during the same period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.8.

(a) An association may organize, form, operate, own, control, have an interest in, own stock of, or be a member of any other association, with or without capital stock, that is engaged in growing, harvesting, curing, drying, trimming, packing, grading, storing, or handling of any cannabis product that is handled by the association, or the byproducts of the cannabis product.

(b) Any two or more associations that are organized pursuant to this section may be merged into one constituent association or consolidated into a new association. The merger or consolidation shall be made in the manner that is prescribed by the general laws of the state that cover domestic corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.9.

(a) Any association may, upon resolution adopted by its board of directors, enter into all necessary and proper contracts and agreements and make all necessary and proper stipulations and arrangements with another cannabis cooperative or association that is formed in this state for the cannabis cooperative and more economical carrying on of its business or any part of its business.

(b) Any two or more associations may, by agreement between them, unite in employing and using, or may separately employ and use, the same personnel, methods, means, and agencies for carrying on and conducting their respective business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 253, Sec. 12.   (AB 133)   Effective September 16, 2017.)